Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Reentry Drug Supervision Pilot Program

439.650.
Definitions for KRS 439.650 to 439.657.

As used in KRS

439.650

to

439.657

:

“Department” means the Department of Corrections;

“Drug” means alcohol or a controlled substance as defined in KRS

218A.010

;

“Drug supervision session” means a meeting between the reentry team and the participant to discuss the participant’s progress through the reentry drug supervision pilot program;

“Participant” means an inmate or parolee selected to participate in the reentry drug supervision pilot program;

“Reentry drug supervision pilot program” or “pilot program” means the program created under KRS

439.651

;

“Reentry team” means the team organized under KRS

439.652

to administer and oversee the reentry drug supervision pilot program; and

“Substance use disorder” has the same meaning as in the current edition of the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 17, effective June 29, 2017.

439.651
Reentry drug supervision pilot program — Duration — Elements — Evaluation — Reports — Administrative regulations.

By March 2018, the department shall implement a reentry drug supervision pilot program with the goal of restoring lives and reducing recidivism through oversight and behavior modification.

The reentry drug supervision pilot program shall last four (4) years and shall:

Be administered and overseen by a reentry team organized under KRS

439.652

;

Be composed of inmates or parolees placed in the pilot program pursuant to KRS

439.653

;

Consist of two (2) phases as outlined in KRS

439.654

;

Provide a continuum of substance use disorder treatments and rehabilitative services;

Monitor participants with frequent drug testing;

Implement a coordinated strategy to govern the pilot program’s responses to participants’ compliance;

Require ongoing reentry team interaction with each participant; and

Forge partnerships among public agencies and community-based organizations.

The department shall monitor and evaluate the reentry drug supervision pilot program to determine:

The number of participants who complete the pilot program;

Of the participants who complete the pilot program, the number who later have their parole revoked and for what offense or, if no longer on parole, the number who commit new offenses and a description of those new offenses;

The number of participants terminated from the pilot program, the reason for their termination, and how long they participated in the pilot program before termination; and

Any savings associated from placing participants in the pilot program versus keeping those participants incarcerated.

For a total of seven (7) years, the department shall provide an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission and to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary by January 1 of each year the reentry drug supervision pilot program is in operation as well as the following three (3) years. The report shall include the data detailed in subsection (3) of this section.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations to implement KRS

439.650

to

439.657

.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 18, effective June 29, 2017.

439.652.
Administration and oversight of pilot program — Reentry team members, training, and functions — Confidentiality of proceedings — Exception.

The reentry team shall administer and oversee the reentry drug supervision pilot program. The team shall consist of the following members:

A department hearing officer shall lead the reentry team and ensure that due process is followed. If reentry team members disagree on incentives or sanctions, the hearing officer shall be the final decision maker;

A parole officer who shall have regular parole officer duties, including drug testing and maintaining records;

A reentry liaison or facilitator from the Division of Probation and Parole;

A social service clinician;

A public defender or his or her designated representative who may or may not be an attorney; and

A designated representative from a community mental health center who shall provide substance use disorder treatment to participants.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall train reentry team members on the philosophy behind drug courts as well as their roles within the team.

The reentry team may provide incentives, including but not limited to the following:

Promotion to the next phase as outlined in KRS

439.654

;

Certificates and tokens;

Compliance credit or any other parole credit approved by the reentry team;

Decreased supervision;

Increased privileges and responsibilities;

Praise from the hearing officer and reentry team;

Extended curfews; and

Other individual incentives approved by the reentry team.

Notwithstanding KRS

439.3108

or 439.340(3)(b) or any other statute to the contrary, only the reentry team may impose sanctions on participants who do not comply with the requirements and conditions established by the reentry team. Notwithstanding KRS

439.3107

or

439.3108

or any other statute to the contrary, sanctions include but are not limited to the following:

Admonishments by the hearing officer;

Graduated sanctions similar to those adopted by the department pursuant to KRS

439.3107

;

Community service;

Phase demotion;

Increased pilot program requirements;

Electronic monitoring;

Home incarceration;

Imprisonment in a state or local correctional or detention facility or residential center for no more than sixty (60) days in any one (1) calendar year; and

Termination from the pilot program.

When considering appropriate sanctions, the reentry team shall consider alternatives to incarceration.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a parole officer may arrest a participant without first consulting the reentry team if the parole officer believes the participant poses an imminent threat to himself or herself or to others. The parole officer shall immediately notify the reentry team of the arrest. Upon receiving notification of the arrest, the reentry team shall then determine whether to impose additional sanctions.

Reentry team proceedings shall be confidential and shall be closed unless otherwise authorized by the hearing officer. Each reentry team member shall sign a confidentiality agreement and shall comply with state and federal confidentiality laws regarding treatment information. Documents contained in a participant’s pilot program case file shall be confidential and only those documents that do not violate these state and federal confidentiality laws shall be released.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 19, effective June 29, 2017.

439.653.
Referral of inmates or parolees to pilot program — Substance use disorder assessments — Factors to be considered — Conditions of referral.

The department shall implement the reentry drug supervision pilot program created under KRS

439.651

for inmates or parolees placed in the pilot program pursuant to this section.

Inmates or parolees may be referred to the Parole Board as candidates for the pilot program by either the department’s clinical staff who assess inmates for substance use disorder as outlined in subsection (3) of this section or the department’s hearing officers as outlined in subsection (4) of this section.

After sentencing, the department shall conduct a substance abuse assessment of the following inmates:

Inmates whose offense for which he or she was sentenced:

Does not qualify him or her as a violent offender as defined in KRS

439.3401

or a sexual offender as defined in KRS

17.550

; and

Did not result in death or serious physical injury of a victim;

Inmates:

Who have been convicted of, or entered an Alford plea or plea of nolo contendere to, a Class C or D felony that is:

A drug offense; or

An offense arising from a substance use disorder; or

Whose probation or parole was revoked due to a substance use disorder or those with a history of substance use disorder; and

Inmates who have not previously participated in the reentry drug supervision pilot program.

After reviewing the substance abuse assessments required under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department shall refer to the Parole Board those inmates determined by the division to be candidates for the reentry drug supervision pilot program.

During a preliminary parole revocation hearing, if a department hearing officer suspects a parolee is suffering from a substance use disorder, the hearing officer may order a one (1) month deferment to allow the department to conduct a substance abuse assessment of the parolee. After evaluating the assessment, the hearing officer may recommend to the Parole Board that the parolee be placed into the pilot program instead of being revoked.

Upon receiving a referral from the department’s clinical staff who assess inmates for substance use disorder pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or from the department’s hearing officers pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the Parole Board shall notify the inmate’s or parolee’s victims, if any, and provide them an opportunity to submit a written victim impact statement and to testify. The Parole Board shall then evaluate the referred inmate or parolee to determine whether to place him or her in the reentry drug supervision pilot program.

When evaluating whether to place a referred inmate or parolee in the reentry drug supervision pilot program, the Parole Board shall consider the following:

Current criminal charges, if any;

Criminal convictions;

Results of the substance abuse assessment conducted pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section;

Plan of recovery created by the department;

Information regarding the victims, if any;

Trial court’s recommendation to participate in the pilot program, if any;

An inmate’s or parolee’s willingness to participate; and

Other relevant information as identified by the department.

After evaluating the referred inmate or parolee pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the Parole Board shall determine whether to place an inmate or parolee into the reentry drug supervision pilot program.

Notwithstanding KRS

218A.1412

or

439.340

or any other statute to the contrary, if the Parole Board decides to place an inmate in the reentry drug supervision pilot program, the inmate shall immediately be paroled into the pilot program. The only conditions of parole shall be to:
(7) (a) 1. Notwithstanding KRS

218A.1412

or

439.340

or any other statute to the contrary, if the Parole Board decides to place an inmate in the reentry drug supervision pilot program, the inmate shall immediately be paroled into the pilot program. The only conditions of parole shall be to:

Have no contact with victims, if applicable;

Pay restitution, if applicable; and

Adhere to KRS

439.650

to

439.657

and to the reentry team’s requirements and conditions.

Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, if the Parole Board decides to place a parolee in the reentry drug supervision pilot program, the parolee shall immediately be entered into the pilot program. The only conditions of parole shall be to:

Adhere to any special conditions established by the Parole Board; and

Adhere to KRS

439.650

to

439.657

and to the reentry team’s requirements and conditions.

Participants shall remain on parole until sentence completion unless the reentry team determines to terminate or administratively discharge the participant from the pilot program. If terminated from the pilot program, the reentry team shall refer the participant to the Parole Board for revocation.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 20, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 141, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

439.654.
Structure and content of pilot program.

The reentry drug supervision pilot program shall consist of two (2) phases lasting a minimum of twelve (12) months or until sentence completion, whichever occurs first. Both phases shall occur after the participant is paroled.

The first phase is an education phase. For the first phase, the participant shall at a minimum:

Provide at least three (3) random drug screens per week;

Attend as many group therapy sessions per week as determined necessary by a community mental health center. The community mental health center shall conduct the group therapy sessions;

Attend one (1) drug supervision session per week;

Obtain and maintain full-time employment, training, or education approved by the reentry team;

Obtain and maintain housing approved by the reentry team;

Make arrangements for payment of court obligations and any probation and parole fees required by the department;

Indicate an appropriate understanding of recovery principles;

Attend self-help programs, such as a twelve (12) step program; and

Remain drug-free for ninety (90) consecutive days in this phase before consideration for promotion to the second phase.

The second phase is the self-motivation phase. For the second phase, the participant shall at a minimum:

Provide at least two (2) random drug screens per week;

Attend as many group therapy sessions per week as determined necessary by a community mental health center. The community mental health center shall conduct the group therapy sessions;

Attend two (2) drug supervision sessions every two (2) weeks;

Maintain full-time employment, training, or education approved by the reentry team;

Maintain housing approved by the reentry team;

Continue paying court obligations and any probation and parole fees required by the department;

Indicate an appropriate understanding of recovery lifestyle;

Continue to attend self-help programs, such as a twelve (12) step program; and

Remain drug-free for ninety (90) consecutive days in this phase.

Participants may be ordered during any phase to comply with additional requirements, including but not limited to the following:

Employment, school, or home visits by the pilot program staff;

Domestic violence counseling with a certified domestic violence treatment provider, or other types of counseling, as referred by the reentry team;

Curfews as established by the reentry team; and

Medical or mental health referrals and subsequent treatment recommendations.

After successful completion of the second phase, if a participant has not yet completed his or her sentence, the participant shall move from the reentry drug supervision pilot program to regular parole.

If the reentry team terminates the participant from the pilot program, the participant shall be referred to the Parole Board for revocation. If terminated, the reentry team shall determine whether the participant may receive credit toward the remainder of his or her sentence for the time spent in the pilot program.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 21, effective June 29, 2017.

439.655.
Suspension from and resumption of pilot program participation.

If reentry drug supervision pilot program participation as outlined in KRS

439.654

is impracticable due to inpatient treatment or similar circumstances in which the participant is being monitored by an authorized third party, the participant shall be placed in suspended status. Upon release from the authorized third party, the participant shall resume participation in the reentry drug supervision pilot program. During the time in which the participant is suspended, no credit shall be earned toward the completion of the two (2) pilot program phases.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 22, effective June 29, 2017.

439.656.
Effect of failure of participant to complete pilot program through no fault of his or her own.

If a participant cannot complete the pilot program through no fault of his or her own, he or she may be administratively discharged. If the reentry team determines that administrative discharge is appropriate, the department shall determine whether to move the participant to regular parole or to refer the participant to the Parole Board for revocation. If administratively discharged, the participant shall receive credit toward the remainder of his or her sentence for the time spent in the pilot program.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

439.657.
Voluntary termination from pilot program.

Participants may request voluntary termination from the pilot program. If the reentry team determines the request is knowingly and voluntarily made, the participant shall be referred to the Parole Board for revocation. If voluntarily terminated, the reentry team shall determine whether the participant may receive credit toward the remainder of his or her sentence for the time spent in the pilot program.

History.

2017 ch. 158, § 24, effective June 29, 2017.